Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 1. Money of Account.

§ 6.2-200.
Money of account.

The money of account of the Commonwealth shall be the dollar, cent, and mill. All accounts by public officers shall be kept in accordance with such monetary units.

No writing shall be invalid, nor shall the force of any account or entry be impaired, because a sum of money is expressed in other monetary units.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.50; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-201.
Ascertaining value in money of account for money expressed in foreign currency.

In any suit for a sum of money expressed in any foreign currency or otherwise than in the money of account of the Commonwealth, the jury or the court shall ascertain the value in the money of account of the sum so expressed, including an appropriate allowance for the difference of exchange. The judgment or order may be for either the amount so ascertained, or for the amount of money so expressed, and the judgment or order shall be discharged by an amount so ascertained.

In any such suit involving an instrument to which §

8.3A-107

is applicable, the provisions of that section shall apply.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.51; 2010, c. 794.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 42.